Utah statutes.
75-3-706.   Employment of appraisers.
The personal representative may employ a qualified and disinterested appraiser
to assist him in ascertaining the fair market value as of the date of the
decedent's death of any asset the value of which may be subject to reasonable
doubt. Different persons may be employed to appraise different kinds of assets
included in the estate. The names and addresses of any appraiser shall be
indicated on the inventory with the item or items he appraised.
